Nevada, session 83, SB66.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 34.738 is hereby amended to read as follows:
34.738 1. A petition that challenges the validity of a
judgment of conviction or sentence must be filed with the clerk of
the district court for the county in which the conviction occurred.
Any other petition must be filed with the clerk of:
(a) The district court for the county in which the petitioner is
incarcerated [; or] , if, at the time the petition is filed, the petitioner
is incarcerated in this State;
(b) The district court for the county in which the petitioner
resides, if, at the time the petition is filed, the petitioner has been
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
released from the custody of the Department of Corrections and
resides in this State; or
(c) The First Judicial District Court in and for Carson City, if ,
at the time the petition is filed, the petitioner [is] :
(1) Is incarcerated outside this State while serving a term of
imprisonment imposed by a court of this State [.] ; or
(2) Has been released from the custody of the Department
of Corrections and resides outside this State.
2. A petition that is not filed in the district court for the
appropriate county:
(a) Shall be deemed to be filed on the date it is received by the
clerk of the district court in which the petition is initially lodged;
and
(b) Must be transferred by the clerk of that court to the clerk of
the district court for the appropriate county.
3. A petition must not challenge both the validity of a judgment
of conviction or sentence and the computation of time that the
petitioner has served pursuant to a judgment of conviction. If a
petition improperly challenges both the validity of a judgment of
conviction or sentence and the computation of time that the
petitioner has served pursuant to a judgment of conviction, the
district court for the appropriate county shall resolve that portion of
the petition that challenges the validity of the judgment of
conviction or sentence and dismiss the remainder of the petition
without prejudice.
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to a
postconviction petition for a writ of habeas corpus filed pursuant to
NRS 34.724 before the effective date of this act.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)